DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-51
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI6XD-01

DTC C 1224 /44 NE Signal Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU receives engine revolution speed signals (NE signals) from the engine
and ECT ECU.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

When any of the following 1. through 2. is detected:
1. At vehicle speed of 30 km/h (19 mph) or more, and
when data received from the engine and ECT ECU is in

normal condition, and open or short circuit for engine ¢ NEO circuit
C1224/44 revolution signal circuit continues for 10 sec. ormore. *Engineand ECTECU
2.While TRCis operating, the conditions that open or short *ABS&BA&TRC&VSCECU

circuit in engine revolution signal circuit is detected,
main throttle opening degree is 0 and IDL switch is OFF
continue for 0.24 sec. or more.

Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the NE signal circuit, the ECU prohibits TRC & VSC controls.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between terminal
NEO of ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU and terminal NEO of engine and ECT ECU
(See page IN-35).

NG> Repair or replace harness and connector.

2 | Check voltage between terminal NEO of ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU and body
ground.
ON PREPARATION:
@ NEO Remove ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU with connectors still con-
nected.
LEEEE ;l[ﬁiﬂﬁﬂrLgflﬁﬁ‘?‘{"f#‘jjjy CHECK:
Y Nz Nz (@ Turn the ignition switch ON.
(b) Measure voltage between terminal NEO of ABS & BA &
TRC & VSC ECU and body ground for the engine condi-
tions below.
F02807 %
Engine condition Voltage
OFF (IG ON) 3 -6Vorbelow1V
ON (ldling) 3 -6V < below1V (Pulse)
(Reference)
3-6V _
Below 1V
F03007

or engine and ECT ECU.

NG> Check and replace ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU
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OK

If the same codes is still output after the DTC is deleted, check the contact condition of each con-
nection.
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